test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-baenngka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bäŋŋka: # N_EVEN (CGrade and umlaut)
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Nom: bäŋŋka
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Gen: bieŋka
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Acc: bieŋkav
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Ill: bäŋŋkaj
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Ine: bieŋkan
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Ela: [bieŋkast, bieŋkas]
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Com: [bieŋkajn, bieŋkajna]
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Nom: bieŋka
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Gen: bieŋkaj
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Acc: bieŋkajd
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Ill: bieŋkajda
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Ine: bieŋkajn
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Ela: [bieŋkajst, bieŋkajs]
    bäŋŋka+N+Pl+Com: [bieŋkaj, bieŋkajgum]
    bäŋŋka+N+Ess: bäŋŋkan
    bäŋŋka+N+Abe: bieŋkadak
